Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.030

Exercise of powers granted.

All powers herein granted to taxing districts in state of Washington may be exercised by such districts. If a taxing district has no officers of its own, such powers may be exercised in its behalf by the officer or officers, board, council or commission having the power to contract in behalf of such district or to levy special assessments or special taxes within such district.

[ 1935 c 143 s 4; RRS s 5608-4.]